Utah statutes.
53A-1a-520.   Accountability -- Rules.
In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act
and after consultation with the State Charter School Board, the State Board of
Education shall make rules that:
(1)  require a charter school to develop an accountability plan, approved by
the State Charter School Board, during its first year of operation;
(2)  require a charter school authorizer to:
(a)  visit a charter school at least once during:
(i)  its first year of operation; and
(ii)  the review period described under Subsection (3); and
(b)  provide written reports to its charter schools after the visits; and
(3)  establish a review process that is required of a charter school once
every five years by its authorizer.
